Massachusetts, session 194th, S494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of Chapter 19D of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after subsection (b) the following subsection:-
(c) An assisted living residence shall not enforce a 30-day notice of vacancy policy in the
event of the resident's death. The assisted living residence shall be entitled to rent and fees for
not more than 10 days from the date of the resident's death. If there is personal property to
remove that impedes the reuse of the room, the 10-day period shall not begin until after the
family, estate, or responsible party has removed the deceased person's personal property. If the
room is occupied by a new resident before the expiration of the 10-day period, rent and fees for
the 10-day period shall be prorated from the date of such occupancy and returned to the family,
estate, or other responsible party.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 60 days after its passage.
of 1